Hawaii statutes.
§352-31 Costs. All costs incurred
under section 352-28 shall be paid by the director out of any funds
appropriated for the Hawaii youth correctional facilities. [L 1980, c 303, pt
of §8(1)]

Note

Section 352-28 referred to in text is repealed.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next